Utah statutes.
75-7-1008.   Exculpation of trustee.
A term of a trust relieving a trustee of liability for breach of trust is
unenforceable to the extent that it:
(1)  relieves the trustee of liability for breach of trust committed in bad
faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the
interests of the beneficiaries; or
(2)  was inserted by the trustee or fiduciary without disclosure of its
existence and contents.
